California, session 20252026, SB1099.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17850 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:17850. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this part to affirm the ability of counties, cities, and hospital districts to provide a state or local public benefit, including health care and other services services, to all residents, if any of these entities has decided to do so at its own discretion.(b) For purposes of this part, “state or local public benefit” has the same meaning as that term as defined in Section 411 of the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193; 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1621) or any successor provision.SEC. 2. Section 17851 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:17851. A city, county, city and county, or hospital district may, at its discretion, provide aid, a state or local public benefit, including health care, care and other services, to persons who, but for Section 411 of the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193; 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1621), would meet eligibility requirements for any program of that entity. the state or local public benefit.